Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 2

Powers and Duties

16-3-201. Jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the court is appellate only, under restrictions and regulations that from time to time are prescribed by law; but it may possess other jurisdiction that is now conferred by law upon the present supreme court.

The court has no original jurisdiction, but appeals and writs of error, or other proceedings for the correction of errors, lie from the inferior courts and court of appeals, within each division, to the supreme court as provided by this code.

The court also has jurisdiction over all interlocutory appeals arising out of matters over which the court has exclusive jurisdiction.

The supreme court may, upon the motion of any party, assume jurisdiction over an undecided case in which a notice of appeal or an application for interlocutory or extraordinary appeal is filed before any intermediate state appellate court.

Subdivision (d)(1) applies only to cases of unusual public importance in which there is a special need for expedited decision and that involve:

State taxes;

The right to hold or retain public office; or

Issues of constitutional law.

The supreme court may, upon its own motion, when there is a compelling public interest, assume jurisdiction over an undecided case in which a notice of appeal or an application for interlocutory or extraordinary appeal is filed with an intermediate state appellate court.

The supreme court may by order take actions necessary or appropriate to the exercise of the authority vested by this section.

Appeals of actions under title 2, chapter 17 relative to election contests shall be to the court of appeals in accordance with the Tennessee rules of appellate procedure.

Code 1858, § 4496 (deriv. Acts 1822, ch. 13, § 4); Acts 1870, ch. 24, § 8; Shan., §§ 377, 6329; mod. Code 1932, §§ 634, 10631; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-304; Acts 1989, ch. 40, § 2; 1992, ch. 952, §§ 11, 12; 1994, ch. 573, § 1; 2001, ch. 256, § 1; 2016, ch. 755, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 40, § 4 provided that any action pending on July 1, 1989, shall be maintained under law prior to the 1989 amendment by that act until its final disposition.

Acts 1992, ch. 952, § 15 provided that the amendments by that act apply to all matters as to which a notice of appeal is filed from and after May 1, 1992.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment inserted “or an application for interlocutory or extraordinary appeal” in (d)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 755, § 2. April 12, 2016.

Cross-References. Constitutional jurisdiction and jurisdiction of supreme court, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 2.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 705.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 16, 51, 138, 210, 222; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 18.

Law Reviews.

Regulation of the Bar in Tennessee (Walter P. Armstrong, Jr.), 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 723 (1986).

“Seeking Justice on Appeal,” 27 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 28 (1991).

Cited: Ashe v. Leech, 653 S.W.2d 398, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 676 (Tenn. 1983); Stewart Title Guar. Co. v. McReynolds, 886 S.W.2d 233, 1994 Tenn. App. LEXIS 296 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1994); State v. Shepherd, 902 S.W.2d 895, 1995 Tenn. LEXIS 269 (Tenn. 1995); Ballard v. Herzke, 924 S.W.2d 652, 1996 Tenn. LEXIS 378 (Tenn. 1996); Holder v. Tennessee Judicial Selection Comm'n, 937 S.W.2d 877, 1996 Tenn. LEXIS 688 (Tenn. 1996); State v. Booher, 978 S.W.2d 953, 1997 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 799 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1997); In re Askew, 993 S.W.2d 1, 1999 Tenn. LEXIS 258 (Tenn. 1999); State v. Brown & Williamson Tobacco Corp., 18 S.W.3d 186, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 194 (Tenn. 2000); Workman v. State, 22 S.W.3d 807, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 655 (Tenn. 2000); Haley v. Univ. of Tennessee-Knoxville, 188 S.W.3d 518, 2006 Tenn. LEXIS 192 (Tenn. 2006); Bailey v. County of Shelby, 188 S.W.3d 539, 2006 Tenn. LEXIS 208 (Tenn. 2006); ACLU v. Darnell, 195 S.W.3d 612, 2006 Tenn. LEXIS 610 (Tenn. 2006); Mills v. Shelby County Election Comm'n, 218 S.W.3d 33, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 589 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2006); Jordan v. Knox County, 213 S.W.3d 751, 2007 Tenn. LEXIS 26 (Tenn. 2007); Bredesen v. Tenn. Judicial Selection Comm'n, 214 S.W.3d 419, 2007 Tenn. LEXIS 121 (Tenn. 2007); Hooker v. Haslam, 393 S.W.3d 156, 2012 Tenn. LEXIS 719 (Tenn. July 27, 2012).

16-3-202. Process, receivers, and references.

The court may appoint receivers, order references and issue all writs and process necessary for the exercise and enforcement of its jurisdiction.

Code 1858, § 4503; Shan., § 6336; mod. Code 1932, § 10637; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-305.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 679.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 152.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

16-3-203. Powers over criminal defendants.

The court may recommit offenders in state cases, when it may appear necessary, and remand them to the inferior court from which their cases were brought to the supreme court, taking recognizances from the defendants, when the offense charged is bailable, with the security that the court judges proper.

Code 1858, § 4498 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 17, § 3); Shan., § 6331; Code 1932, § 10632; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-306.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bail and Recognizance, § 4; 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 18.

16-3-204. Bonds and recognizances.

The court may give judgment upon any and all bonds or recognizances, whether in civil or criminal cases, executed in the progress of the cause, under the general provisions of law, or by lawful order of the court, either in the inferior or supreme court, and enforce the same by execution or otherwise, as in the case of other judgments and decrees of the court.

Process of scire facias may, in all such cases, be issued as is proper in similar cases in the inferior courts, and, upon appearance of the defendant, and issue of fact made thereon, the court may order a jury to be summoned forthwith to determine the issue, and may give judgment thereon as the inferior courts of law might do in similar cases.

Code 1858, §§ 4499, 4500 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 199, § 3); Shan., §§ 6332, 6333; Code 1932, §§ 10633, 10634; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-307.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 265; 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 18.

16-3-205. Supersedeas by judges.

The judges of the supreme court, or any one of them, on a proper case being made out, shall have the authority to grant the process of supersedeas to an execution, returnable to their own court, in the same manner the supreme court, while it is in session, can grant such process, also grant supersedeas to the execution of an interlocutory decree of an inferior court, in the cases provided for in § 27-1-103 [repealed].

Code 1858, §§ 4512, 4513 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 15; 1851-1852, ch. 181, § 4); Shan., §§ 6347, 6348; Code 1932, §§ 10649, 10650; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-308.

Compiler's Notes. Section 27-1-103, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 1(8). For present provisions, see T.R.A.P. 3, 7, 10, 13, 24, 36.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 265; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 15.

Cited: Clements v. Roberts, 144 Tenn. 129, 230 S.W. 30, 1920 Tenn. LEXIS 66 (1921).

16-3-206. Vacating judgment.

In all cases in which the supreme court may give judgment or decree through inadvertence and oversight, when upon the face of the record no cause of action existed against the party, the court may, upon its own motion, vacate the judgment or decree.

Code 1858, § 4501 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 135); Shan., § 6334; mod. Code 1932, § 10635; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-309.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 265; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 47; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 9.

Cited: Fort v. Dixie Oil Co., 171 Tenn. 199, 101 S.W.2d 692, 1936 Tenn. LEXIS 80 (1937).

16-3-207. Correction of apparent mistakes.

The court may, at any time after final judgment, correct mistakes apparent on the face of the record, as provided in § 20-11-106 [repealed].

Code 1858, § 4502 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 70, § 2); Shan., § 6335; Code 1932, § 10636; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-310.

Compiler's Notes. Section 20-11-106, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 106, § 1. Section Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.01 was intended to supersede § 20-11-106. The Committee Comment to that rule reads: “60.01: This Rule supersedes the provisions of Tenn. Code Ann. §§ 20-1508 [repealed], 20-11-106 and 20-11-107, although it is generally consistent with the purpose of those statutes. The provisions of the Rule are somewhat more flexible than the statutory procedures.”

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 265; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 46; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 825.

Cited: Fort v. Dixie Oil Co., 171 Tenn. 199, 101 S.W.2d 692, 1936 Tenn. LEXIS 80 (1937).

16-3-208. Appeals taken before term.

All appeals, and appeals in the nature of a writ of error, taken from the final judgment or decree of an inferior court, at any time before the sitting of the supreme court, shall stand for hearing at the first term, without notice to the opposite party.

Code 1858, § 4514 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 19); Shan., § 6349; Code 1932, § 10651; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-312.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 51, 58, 218.

Cited: Harmon v. Hart, 53 S.W. 310, 1899 Tenn. Ch. App. LEXIS 74 (1899).

16-3-209. Appeal during term.

An appeal, appeal in the nature of a writ of error, or writ of error may be prosecuted from any final judgment or decree, rendered in an inferior court during the term of the supreme court, the record being filed in the court, and the opposite party, or the opposite party's counsel, notified five (5) days before the hearing.

Code 1858, § 4515 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 19); Shan., § 6350; Code 1932, § 10652; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-313.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 51-58, 218.

Cited: Tipton v. Tipton, 118 Tenn. 691, 104 S.W. 237, 1907 Tenn. LEXIS 71 (1907).

16-3-210. Scheduling of districts.

The court may class the judicial districts to set the causes from each district for trial on certain weeks of the term, and make publication of the classes before the beginning of the term.

Code 1858, § 4505; Shan., § 6338; mod. Code 1932, § 10640; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-314.

16-3-211. Order of counties in districts.

The supreme court, except as otherwise provided, shall take up and try the cases from the different counties in a judicial district in the order in which the counties are named in the section of chapter 2 of this title that prescribes the times of holding court in the judicial district; and when the business of a county is taken up, it shall be argued before passing to the business of another county, unless postponed for satisfactory reasons to the court.

Acts 1868-1869, ch. 28, § 4; Shan., § 6339; mod. Code 1932, § 10641; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-315.

16-3-212. Special personnel for expedition of post-conviction proceedings in capital cases.

The supreme court is authorized to employ, reassign or contract with individuals utilizing special funds appropriated solely for the purpose of providing prompt and fair adjudication of post-conviction proceedings in capital sentence cases, including authority to assign the additional personnel the duties of personnel reassigned to the post-conviction cases. In no event shall the employment, contract or expenditures under this authority extend beyond a two-year period.

Acts 1993, ch. 472, § 4.

Cross-References. Appropriation of funds, § 16-3-806.